Florida, session 2026, HB1001.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
32
33 Section 1. Section 125.595, Florida Statutes, is created
34 to read:
35 125.595 Prohibition of official actions of counties
36 relating to diversity, equity, and inclusion; penalty; remedy.—
37 (1) For purposes of this section, the term:
38 (a) "Acting in an official capacity" means performing or
39 purporting to perform a function, duty, or responsibility
40 assigned by law, rule, or policy to a public officer or public
41 employee, or otherwise exercising or claiming to exercise the
42 authority of such office or employment.
43 (b) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion" means any effort
44 to:
45 1. Manipulate or otherwise influence the composition of
46 employees with reference to race, color, sex, ethnicity, gender
47 identity, or sexual orientation other than to ensure that hiring
48 is conducted in accordance with state and federal
49 antidiscrimination laws;
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
50 2. Promote or provide preferential treatment or special
51 benefits to a person or group based on that person's or group's
52 race, color, sex, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual
53 orientation; or
54 3. Promote or adopt training, programming, or activities
55 designed or implemented with reference to race, color, sex,
56 ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual orientation.
57
58 The term does not include the use of equal opportunity or equal
59 employment opportunity materials designed to inform a person
60 about the prohibition against discrimination based on protected
61 status under state or federal law.
62 (c) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion office" means any
63 office, division, department, agency, center, or other unit of a
64 county which coordinates, creates, develops, designs,
65 implements, organizes, plans, or promotes policies, programming,
66 training, practices, meetings, activities, procedures, or
67 similar actions relating to diversity, equity, and inclusion.
68 (d) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion officer" means a
69 person who is a full-time or part-time employee of, or an
70 independent contractor contracted by, a county whose duties
71 include coordinating, creating, developing, designing,
72 implementing, organizing, planning, or promoting policies,
73 programming, training, practices, meetings, activities,
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
74 procedures, or similar actions relating to diversity, equity,
75 and inclusion.
76 (2) A county may not fund or promote, directly or
77 indirectly, or take any official action, including, but not
78 limited to, the adoption or enforcement of ordinances,
79 resolutions, rules, regulations, programs, or policies, as it
80 relates to diversity, equity, and inclusion. Any such existing
81 ordinances, resolutions, rules, regulations, programs, or
82 policies are void.
83 (3) A county may not expend any funds, regardless of
84 source, to establish, sustain, support, or staff a diversity,
85 equity, and inclusion office or to employ, contract, or
86 otherwise engage a person to serve as a diversity, equity, and
87 inclusion officer.
88 (4) A county commissioner or other county official acting
89 in an official capacity who violates this section commits
90 misfeasance or malfeasance in office.
91 (5) A county may not provide or authorize its funds to be
92 used by employees, contractors, volunteers, vendors, or agents
93 to promote diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives.
94 (6) An action in circuit court may be brought by a
95 resident of the county against a county that violates this
96 section. The court may enter a judgment awarding declaratory and
97 injunctive relief, damages, and costs.
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
98 (7)(a) This section does not prohibit any official action
99 by a county required for compliance with state or federal laws
100 or regulations.
101 (b) This section does not prohibit a county from doing any
102 of the following:
103 1. Recognizing or promoting holidays designated by federal
104 law, including those designated in 5 U.S.C. s. 6103.
105 2. Recognizing or promoting state holidays and special
106 observances designated by state law, including those designated
107 in chapter 683.
108 3. Recognizing or promoting patriotic and national
109 observances recognized by federal law, including those
110 designated in 36 U.S.C. ss. 101-148, or recognizing the events
111 and individuals forming the basis for such observances.
112 4. Recognizing or honoring the individuals and groups
113 recognized and honored by the monuments, memorials, and museums
114 authorized by chapter 265, ss. 267.0722 and 267.0724, or
115 national monuments and memorials designated by acts of Congress,
116 or recognizing the events and individuals forming the basis for
117 such monuments, memorials, or museums.
118 5. Issuing event permits in a content-neutral manner and
119 providing public safety services.
120 (c) This section does not prohibit the use of equal
121 opportunity or equal employment opportunity materials designed
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
122 to inform a person about the prohibition against discrimination
123 based on protected status under state or federal law.
124 (d) This section may not be construed to conflict with:
125 1. Section 553.865 or analogous state and federal laws
126 protecting the right of males and females to restrooms and
127 changing facilities corresponding to their biological sex.
128 2. Part XII of chapter 39 or analogous state and federal
129 laws ensuring that victims of domestic violence and their
130 dependents have access to emergency shelters.
131 3. Section 1000.05 or analogous state and federal laws
132 prohibiting discrimination based on biological sex in
133 educational programs, sports, activities, and employment.
134 4. Chapter 381 or analogous state and federal laws
135 ensuring males and females have access to public health services
136 corresponding to their biological sex.
137 5. State and federal laws ensuring access to public health
138 care services corresponding to a person's race or ethnicity.
139 6. Any other state or federal laws recognizing the
140 inherent biological differences between males and females for
141 the purpose of ensuring their health, safety, and welfare.
142 (8) This section does not apply to:
143 (a) The actions of a body composed of nonelected
144 volunteers; or
145 (b) Basic administrative support provided to a body
146 composed of nonelected volunteers, unless such administrative
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
147 support is provided by a county employee whose sole function is
148 the provision of such administrative support.
149 Section 2. Section 166.04971, Florida Statutes, is created
150 to read:
151 166.04971 Prohibition of official actions of
152 municipalities relating to diversity, equity, and inclusion;
153 penalty; remedy.—
154 (1) For purposes of this section, the term:
155 (a) "Acting in an official capacity" means performing or
156 purporting to perform a function, duty, or responsibility
157 assigned by law, rule, or policy to a public officer or public
158 employee, or otherwise exercising or claiming to exercise the
159 authority of such office or employment.
160 (b) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion" means any effort
161 to:
162 1. Manipulate or otherwise influence the composition of
163 employees with reference to race, color, sex, ethnicity, gender
164 identity, or sexual orientation other than to ensure that hiring
165 is conducted in accordance with state and federal
166 antidiscrimination laws;
167 2. Promote or provide preferential treatment or special
168 benefits to a person or group based on that person's or group's
169 race, color, sex, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual
170 orientation; or
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
171 3. Promote or adopt training, programming, or activities
172 designed or implemented with reference to race, color, sex,
173 ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual orientation.
174
175 The term does not include the use of equal opportunity or equal
176 employment opportunity materials designed to inform a person
177 about the prohibition against discrimination based on protected
178 status under state or federal law.
179 (c) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion office" means any
180 office, division, department, agency, center, or other unit of a
181 municipality which coordinates, creates, develops, designs,
182 implements, organizes, plans, or promotes policies, programming,
183 training, practices, meetings, activities, procedures, or
184 similar actions relating to diversity, equity, and inclusion.
185 (d) "Diversity, equity, and inclusion officer" means a
186 person who is a full-time or part-time employee of, or an
187 independent contractor contracted by, a municipality whose
188 duties include coordinating, creating, developing, designing,
189 implementing, organizing, planning, or promoting policies,
190 programming, training, practices, meetings, activities,
191 procedures, or similar actions relating to diversity, equity,
192 and inclusion.
193 (2) A municipality may not fund or promote, directly or
194 indirectly, or take any official action, including, but not
195 limited to, the adoption or enforcement of ordinances,
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
196 resolutions, rules, regulations, programs, or policies, as it
197 relates to diversity, equity, and inclusion. Any such existing
198 ordinances, resolutions, rules, regulations, programs, or
199 policies are void.
200 (3) A municipality may not expend any funds, regardless of
201 source, to establish, sustain, support, or staff a diversity,
202 equity, and inclusion office or to employ, contract, or
203 otherwise engage a person to serve as a diversity, equity, and
204 inclusion officer.
205 (4) Any member of the governing body of a municipality or
206 other municipal official acting in an official capacity who
207 violates this section commits misfeasance or malfeasance in
208 office.
209 (5) A municipality may not provide or authorize its funds
210 to be used by employees, contractors, volunteers, vendors, or
211 agents to promote diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives.
212 (6) An action in circuit court may be brought by a
213 resident of the municipality against a municipality that
214 violates this section. The court may enter a judgment awarding
215 declaratory and injunctive relief, damages, and costs.
216 (7)(a) This section does not prohibit any official action
217 by the governing body of a municipality required for compliance
218 with state or federal laws or regulations.
219 (b) This section does not prohibit a municipality from
220 doing any of the following:
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
221 1. Recognizing or promoting holidays designated by federal
222 law, including those designated in 5 U.S.C. s. 6103.
223 2. Recognizing or promoting state holidays and special
224 observances designated by state law, including those designated
225 in chapter 683.
226 3. Recognizing or promoting patriotic and national
227 observances recognized by federal law, including those
228 designated in 36 U.S.C. ss. 101-148, or recognizing the events
229 and individuals forming the basis for such observances.
230 4. Recognizing or honoring the individuals and groups
231 recognized and honored by the monuments, memorials, and museums
232 authorized by chapter 265, ss. 267.0722 and 267.0724, or
233 national monuments and memorials designated by acts of Congress,
234 or recognizing the events and individuals forming the basis for
235 such monuments, memorials, or museums.
236 5. Issuing event permits in a content-neutral manner and
237 providing public safety services.
238 (c) This section does not prohibit the use of equal
239 opportunity or equal employment opportunity materials designed
240 to inform a person about the prohibition against discrimination
241 based on protected status under state or federal law.
242 (d) This section may not be construed to conflict with:
243 1. Section 553.865 or analogous state and federal laws
244 protecting the right of males and females to restrooms and
245 changing facilities corresponding to their biological sex.
Page 10 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
246 2. Part XII of chapter 39 or analogous state and federal
247 laws ensuring that victims of domestic violence and their
248 dependents have access to emergency shelters.
249 3. Section 1000.05 or analogous state and federal laws
250 prohibiting discrimination based on biological sex in
251 educational programs, sports, activities, and employment.
252 4. Chapter 381 or analogous state and federal laws
253 ensuring males and females have access to public health services
254 corresponding to their biological sex.
255 5. State and federal laws ensuring access to public health
256 care services corresponding to a person's race or ethnicity.
257 6. Any other state or federal laws recognizing the
258 inherent biological differences between males and females for
259 the purpose of ensuring their health, safety, and welfare.
260 (8) This section does not apply to:
261 (a) The actions of a body composed of nonelected
262 volunteers; or
263 (b) Basic administrative support provided to a body
264 composed of nonelected volunteers, unless such administrative
265 support is provided by a municipal employee whose sole function
266 is the provision of such administrative support.
267 Section 3. Section 287.139, Florida Statutes, is created
268 to read:
269 287.139 Prohibition against using diversity, equity, and
270 inclusion material.—A potential recipient of a county or
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 1001 2026
271 municipal contract or grant shall certify to the county or
272 municipality, as applicable, before being awarded such contract
273 or grant that the potential recipient does not and will not use
274 county or municipal funds in requiring its employees,
275 contractors, volunteers, vendors, or agents to ascribe to,
276 study, or be instructed using materials relating to diversity,
277 equity, and inclusion as defined in ss. 125.595(1) and
278 166.04971(1).
279 Section 4. Section 287.139, Florida Statutes, as created
280 by this act, applies to any contract between a county or
281 municipality and a diversity, equity, and inclusion officer
282 which is in existence on January 1, 2027. With respect to all
283 other contracts, s. 287.139, Florida Statutes, created by this
284 act, applies to contracts executed or renewed after January 1,
285 2027.
286 Section 5. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1001-02-c2